Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,118
General violations; penalty; second offenses; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of the Uniform Credentialing Act, except as specific penalties are otherwise imposed in the act, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any person for a second violation of any of the provisions of the act, for which another specific penalty is not expressly imposed, shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 66, p. 471;

C.S.1929, § 71-804;

R.S.1943, § 71-167;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 142;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-167;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 118.

Each treatment on different days constitutes a separate offense. Harvey v. State, 96 Neb. 786, 148 N.W. 924 (1914).